Utah statutes.
48-3a-408.   Reimbursement, indemnification, advancement, and insurance.

(1)  A limited liability company shall reimburse a member of a member-managed limited liability company or the manager of a manager-managed limited liability company for any payment made by the member or manager in the course of the member's or manager's activities on behalf of the limited liability company, if the member or manager complied with Sections 48-3a-407 and 48-3a-409 in making the payment.

(2)  A limited liability company shall indemnify and hold harmless a person with respect to any claim or demand against the person and any debt, obligation, or other liability incurred by the person by reason of the person's former or present capacity as a member or manager, if the claim, demand, debt, obligation, or other liability does not arise from the person's breach of Section 48-3a-405, 48-3a-407, or 48-3a-409.

(3)  In the ordinary course of its activities and affairs, a limited liability company may advance reasonable expenses, including attorney's fees and costs, incurred by a person in connection with a claim or demand against the person by reason of the person's former or present capacity as a member or manager, if the person promises to repay the limited liability company if the person ultimately is determined not to be entitled to be indemnified under Subsection (2).

(4)  A limited liability company may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a member or manager of the limited liability company against liability asserted against or incurred by the member or manager in that capacity or arising from that status even if, under Subsection 48-3a-112(3)(g), the operating agreement could not eliminate or limit the person's liability to the limited liability company for the conduct giving rise to the liability.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

